Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 8. Bonds.

Sec. 42.40.600.
General provisions.

Upon receiving legislative approval under AS

42.40.285

the corporation may issue bonds by resolution to provide money to carry out its purposes.

Bonds may be issued in one or more series and shall, as provided by the resolution of the board,

be dated;

bear fixed or variable interest at a specified rate or rates per year or within a maximum rate;

be in a specified denomination;

be in a coupon or registered form;

carry conversion or registration provisions;

have a specified rank or priority;

be executed in the specified manner and form;

be payable as specified from the sources, in the medium of payment, and place or places inside or outside the state;

be subject to authentication by a trustee or fiscal agent; and

be subject to terms of redemption with or without premium.

Bonds may be sold in the manner, on the terms, and at the price the board determines. Notes shall mature at the time or times determined by the board. Except for bond anticipation notes, notes, or other obligations, bonds shall mature at the time, not exceeding 50 years from their date, determined by the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.610.
Negotiable instruments.

Bonds issued under this chapter and interest coupons attached to them are negotiable instruments under the laws of this state, subject only to applicable provisions for registration.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.620.
Bonds eligible for investment.

Bonds issued under this chapter are securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the state and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them.
These bonds may be deposited with a state or municipal officer of an agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds of the state is authorized by law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.630.
Payment of bonds.

The principal and interest on bonds of the corporation is payable from corporation money or assets. Bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of a grant or contribution from the federal or state government, a municipality, a corporation, an association, an institution, or a person, or a pledge of money, income, or revenue of the corporation from any source.

[Repealed, § 13 ch 64 SLA 2018.]

Before issuing bonds to provide the financing described in AS

42.40.570

for real or personal property to be owned in whole or in part by an entity other than the corporation, the corporation shall enter into one or more contracts, leases, or other forms of agreement that will, in the judgment of the corporation, provide sufficient consideration to

pay the principal of and interest on the bonds as they become due;

create and maintain any reserves for the bond payments that the corporation considers necessary or desirable; and

pay all costs necessary to issue, service, or additionally secure the bonds, including trustee’s fees and bond insurance premiums, unless these costs are to be paid from bond proceeds or by a party other than the corporation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 71 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 65 SLA 2007; am § 13 ch 64 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings, intent, and statement of purpose applicable to ch. 65, SLA 2007, the Act that added subsection (c) of this section, see § 1, ch. 65, SLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, repealed (b).

Sec. 42.40.640.
Security for bonds.

In the discretion of the board, an issue of bonds may be secured by a trust indenture, which may be a trust company, bank or national banking association, with corporate trust powers, located inside or outside the state, or by a secured loan agreement or other instrument or under resolution giving powers to a corporate trustee by means of which the corporation may

make and enter into any and all the covenants and agreements with the trustees or the holders of the bonds that the corporation may determine to be necessary or desirable, including covenants, provisions, limitations, and agreements as to

the application, investment, deposit, use, and disposition of the proceeds of bonds of the corporation or of money or other property of the corporation or in which it has an interest;

the fixing and collection of rentals, charges, fees, or other consideration for, and the other terms to be incorporated in, contracts with respect to the use of any of the corporation’s property;

the fixing and collection of tariffs, fees, charges, or other consideration for the use or service of the Alaska Railroad by passengers, and other users and freight;

the terms and conditions upon which additional bonds of the corporation may be issued;

the vesting in the trustee of rights and remedies exercisable by the trustee for the protection of the holders of bonds of the corporation and not otherwise in violation of law and the restriction of the rights of an individual holder of bonds of the corporation;

pledge, mortgage, or assign money, leases, agreements, assets, or property of the corporation either presently in hand or to be received in the future, or both; and

provide for any other matters of like or different character that in any way affect the security or protection of the bonds.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.650.
Independent financial advisor.

In negotiating the private or public sale of bonds to an underwriter, the board shall retain a financial advisor who is independent from the underwriter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.660.
Validity of signatures.

If an officer of the corporation whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on bonds or coupons attached to them ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bond or coupon, the signature or facsimile is valid the same as if the person had remained in office until delivery.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.670.
Validity of pledge.

The pledge of assets or revenue of the corporation to the payment of the principal or interest on bonds of the corporation is valid and binding from the time the pledge is made and the assets or revenue are immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery or further act. The lien of a pledge is valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind against the corporation, irrespective of whether those parties have notice of the lien of the pledge.

Nothing in this section prohibits the corporation from selling assets subject to a pledge, except that a sale may be restricted by the trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.675.
Pledge of the state.

The state pledges to and agrees with the holders of bonds issued under this chapter and with the federal agency that loans or contributes funds in respect to a project, that the state will not limit or alter the rights and powers vested in the corporation by this chapter to fulfill the terms of a contract made by the corporation with the holders or federal agency, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the bonds together with the interest on them with interest on unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with an action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders, are fully met and discharged. The corporation is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state, insofar as it refers to holders of bonds of the corporation, in a contract with the holders and insofar as it relates to a federal agency, in a contract with the federal agency.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.680.
Remedies.

A holder of bonds issued under this chapter or of coupons attached to them, and a trustee under a trust agreement or resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, except as restricted by a trust agreement or resolution, either at law or in equity, may

enforce all rights granted under this chapter, the trust agreement or resolution, or any other contract executed by the corporation under this chapter; and

compel the performance of all duties of the corporation required by this chapter or by the trust agreement or resolution.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.690.
Credit of state not pledged.

The state and its political subdivisions are not liable for the debts of the corporation. Bonds issued under this chapter are payable solely from the revenue or assets of the corporation and do not constitute a

debt, liability, or obligation of the state or of a political subdivision of the state; or

pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of a political subdivision of the state.

The corporation may not pledge the credit or the taxing power of the state or its political subdivisions. Each bond issued under this chapter shall contain on its face a statement that

the corporation is not obligated to pay it or the interest on it except from the revenue or assets pledged for it; and

neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or of a political subdivision of the state is pledged to the payment of it.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.695.
Public purpose of bonds.

Bonds of the corporation issued to finance the acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipping, and operation of real and personal property, including facilities and equipment, described in AS

42.40.570

are issued by a public corporation and an instrumentality of the state for an essential public and governmental purpose.

History.

(§ 4 ch 71 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 46 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 65 SLA 2007; am § 8 ch 64 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings, intent, and statement of purpose applicable to the 2007 Act that amended this section, see § 1, ch. 65, SLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision requiring the Alaska Railroad Corporation to report to the Resources Committees and Finance Committees of the legislature in 2019, 2020, and 2021 on its activities under this section, see sec. 23, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, deleted “of the corporation issued to finance facilities described in AS

42.40.550

and

42.40.560

and bonds” following “Bonds”.

Sec. 42.40.700.
Limitation on personal liability.

A board member or employee of the corporation is not subject to personal liability or accountability because of the execution or issuance of bonds.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)